Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2302
Purpose of act.

It is the purpose of the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act to allow local governmental units which cooperate with other governmental units to issue bonds to finance joint projects which may be serviced by property taxes, regardless of the restrictions on the issuance of debt contained in other statutory provisions, home rule charters, or the limitations in section 77-3442, for the acquisition, construction, financing, operation, and ownership of (1) public buildings and related improvements to real estate, recreational facilities and related improvements, flood control and storm water drainage, and street and road construction and improvements and (2) information technology for libraries operated by counties, municipalities, school districts, educational service units, and community colleges.

Laws 2005, LB 217, § 2.